Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 3. Adjudication
§ 41-4-317.
Determination of priorities to streams; limitations on amount of water to be allotted; disposition of excess water generally.

At the first regular meeting of the board of control after the completion of such measurement by the state engineer, and the return of said evidence by said division superintendent, it shall be the duty of the board of control to make and cause to be entered of record in its office, an order determining and establishing the several priorities of right to the use of waters of said stream, and the amounts of appropriations of the several persons claiming water from such stream, and the character and kind of use for which said appropriation shall be found to have been made. Each appropriation shall be determined in its priority and amount, by the time by which it shall have been made, and the amount of water which shall have been supplied for beneficial purposes; provided, that such appropriator shall at no time be entitled to the use of more water than he can make a beneficial application of on lands, for the benefit of which the appropriation may have been secured, and the amount of any appropriation made by reason of an enlargement of distributing works, shall be determined in like manner; provided, that no allotment for the direct use of the natural unstored flow of any stream shall exceed one (1) cubic foot per second for each seventy (70) acres of land for which said appropriation shall be made, and provided, further, where there may be in any stream water in excess of the total amount of all appropriations from said stream, such excess shall be divided among the appropriators therefrom in proportion to the acreage covered by their respective permits, and provided, also, that such additional water shall be beneficially used, except as hereinafter provided.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 25; R.S. 1899, § 872; C.S. 1910, § 777; C.S. 1920, § 898; Laws 1921, ch. 89, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 122-117; Laws 1935, ch. 105, § 1; 1945, ch. 153, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-216; W.S. 1957, § 41-181.

Plaintiff not injured by statute. —

It was impossible for plaintiff's post-March 1, 1945 water right to be injured by the Wyoming Surplus Water Law because he never obtained any right greater than the one authorized by the statute. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Thus, no standing to challenge constitutionality. —

Since plaintiff could not attack the constitutionality of the Wyoming Surplus Water Law, ch. 153, Laws 1945, on the ground of injury to rights of others, and there was no injury to plaintiff's post-March 1, 1945, rights, since only prior appropriators, not subsequent ones, could be injured by the statute, plaintiff did not have standing to challenge the constitutionality of the statute. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Purpose of act. —

Section

41-4-310

was enacted as state policy to establish certainty as foundational basis of justice in administration of water rights, and requiring all thereunder to submit proofs within one year; and statute clearly holds that plaintiffs have a water right, as to priority and amount, as awarded by board of control, and no other or greater. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

The purpose and effect of the Wyoming Surplus Water Law, ch. 153, Laws 1945, was to define, limit and clearly provide for the vesting of the right to use the excess water by the several appropriators which had been recognized in ch. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Interpretation applied to Wyoming Surplus Water Law statutory provisions by state officers. —

See Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

“Statutory limit of volume.” —

The “statutory limit of volume” mentioned in defining a water right in §

41-3-101

, and again in this section, of 1 cu. ft. per second for each 70 acres, refers only to rights adjudicated under state laws and not under adjudication by territorial courts. Quinn v. John Whitaker Ranch Co., 54 Wyo. 367, 92 P.2d 568,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1939).

No maximum allotment as to water rights via reservoirs. —

While the legislature has, as to water rights via reservoirs, established no maximum allotment of water per unit of land as a counterpart to that relating to the use of direct flow (§

41-4-317

), such circumstance does not alter the fact that art. 8, §§ 1 and 3, Wyo. Const., provides generally, “The water of all natural streams, springs, lakes or other collections of still water, within the boundaries of the state, are hereby declared to be the property of the state,” and “Priority of appropriation for beneficial uses shall give the better right.” Kearney Lake, Land & Reservoir Co. v. Lake DeSmet Reservoir Co., 475 P.2d 548,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. 1970).

“Adjudication.” —

“Adjudication” of stream priorities is a proceeding in rem, or quasi in rem; and adjudication is generally considered the equivalent of “determination.” Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

The board of control has broad powers,

direct and implied. White v. Wheatland Irrigation Dist., 413 P.2d 252,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1966).

Board of control adjudicating priorities on two streams in separate proceedings has jurisdiction and adjudications are binding on parties directly involved, serving as prima facie evidence of correctness as to those not party to proceedings. Laramie Irrigation & Power Co. v. Grant, 44 Wyo. 392, 13 P.2d 235,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1932).

Presumption that due notice given. —

If any tribunal has unlimited jurisdiction over a class of cases, it stands on same footing as courts of general jurisdiction respecting presumptions of regularity, including presumption that due notice was given. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Where recital appears in water right adjudication decree, by state board of control, that due notice had been given to interested parties, presumption will be indulged in favor of such inferior tribunal as obtains with respect of courts of general jurisdiction, to show jurisdiction of parties. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Original appropriators, predecessors of plaintiffs, having been afforded full opportunity to present their claims for adjudication of water rights, were not deprived of any constitutional right, and plaintiffs are in no better position. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

In action to quiet title to water right, notice of adjudication of Big Laramie river having been appropriately given, evidence of which was offered by plaintiff, was sufficient to show that board of control had jurisdiction to adjudicate rights in that stream, thus giving defendants, and all similarly situated, prima facie right to water therefrom adjudicated to them, and hence also showing their interest in controversy. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Presumption that appearance made. —

Where adjudication, by state board of control, of water rights on Little Laramie river, though failing to recite that notice was given interested parties, was had nearly 50 years ago, and courts indulge presumptions the more readily when proceedings are ancient, when the attack is collateral, and when it is admitted that decree adjudicated rights in favor of plaintiffs' predecessors in interest, it must be presumed it was after appearance. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

In action to quiet title to water right prescriptively claimed by plaintiffs in Little Laramie river, allegation in defendant's answer that board of control had adjudicated a water right to predecessor of plaintiffs, which was admitted, carried with it presumption of appearance and also of regularity, and all objections to pleadings must be overruled. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Correct adjudication presumed. —

In action to quiet title to water rights, plaintiffs pleaded prescriptive right thereto in Little Laramie river waters, to which defendant answered in part, setting up decrees of their predecessors, and, not being denied, presumption of their correctness arose, making further pleading or proof of correctness unnecessary. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Orders of the board of control

establishing water rights are clothed with the dignity of decrees entered by the courts. White v. Wheatland Irrigation Dist., 413 P.2d 252,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1966).

The water right of any appropriator is limited to beneficial use,

and, even though a larger amount of water has been adjudicated, the water right is subject to reduction if not applied for beneficial purposes. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

The quantity of water each appropriator is entitled to divert at any particular time is the quantity within limits of decree under territorial laws reasonably necessary for the acreage stated in the decree. Quinn v. John Whitaker Ranch Co., 54 Wyo. 367, 92 P.2d 568,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1939).

Adjudication should be made only for water which has been applied to beneficial use. —

A definite adjudication of a water right should, ordinarily at least, be made only for water which has been applied to a beneficial use. Laramie Rivers Co. v. Levasseur, 65 Wyo. 414, 202 P.2d 680,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1949).

But beneficial use is determined at time controversy arises. —

Beneficial use is to be figured at the very time when any controversy arises. Thus a decree adjudicating an appropriation of water in excess of what had been applied to a beneficial use at the time could not be attacked in a subsequent action where the whole of the initiated appropriation had been applied to beneficial use when the subsequent action was instituted. Laramie Rivers Co. v. Levasseur, 65 Wyo. 414, 202 P.2d 680,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1949).

Waste. —

Use in excess of one cubic foot of water per second for each 70 acres, under an adjudication in 1889 by territorial court, and in excess of that now legislatively authorized, was not prima facie evidence of waste. Quinn v. John Whitaker Ranch Co., 54 Wyo. 367, 92 P.2d 568,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1939).

Vesting of water rights. —

Water rights are real property rights which become vested as of the time the application for appropriation is filed, if the right is adjudicated. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Rights subject to those of prior appropriators. —

Pursuant to art. 8, § 2, Wyo. Const., and the statutes adopted by the Wyoming legislature, water rights are perfected by the filing of an application for a water permit which then is adjudicated to the applicant by the board of control after the board has determined that the applicant does have such a right by beneficial use. The right of a citizen of Wyoming to appropriate water for purposes of irrigation is defined and limited by these statutes. Each appropriator, in turn, takes his right subject to the right of any prior appropriators from the stream. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Duty of officers to distribute water. —

It is the duty of officers charged with superintendence of diversion of waters to make distribution in accordance with adjudications. Quinn v. John Whitaker Ranch Co., 54 Wyo. 367, 92 P.2d 568,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1939).

But prior adjudication not required. —

A lawful adjudication of the rights of appropriators on a stream is not required before the water commissioner can act. Distribution can be made under an uncompleted permit as well as under a certificate of appropriation. And the rule applies equally to an appropriator under the territorial law by posting notice. Laramie Rivers Co. v. Levasseur, 65 Wyo. 414, 202 P.2d 680,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1949).

Assignment of water rights. —

Under decree determining water rights, development company which conveyed certain land with its water rights was not by this section required to assign water supply of 1 cubic foot per second for each 70 acres. Anderson v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 60 Wyo. 417, 154 P.2d 318,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1944).

Water use enforceable. —

A deed under which appropriators covenant to permit use of all water to which parties to the deed were entitled, on alternate weeks, is enforcible as against a subsequent appropriator, where no more water was shown to have been used by the parties to the deed than they could use beneficially. Johnston v. Little Horse Creek Irrigating Co., 13 Wyo. 208, 79 P. 22,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1904).

Jurisdiction of courts. —

Jurisdiction of courts, in matters of water adjudication, is, aside from appeals, confined to determining rights in individual cases, to the extent that the board of control has not acted. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Showing of interest necessary to attack another's right. —

Before a party may attack right of another, either on constitutional or other grounds, he must show an interest which is affected, or a right invaded, which cannot obtain where plaintiff enjoys a decreed water right which cannot be enlarged. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Complaint for injunction against diversion must show individual defendants fail to make beneficial use of water. —

Even if an allegation in a complaint for injunctive relief against diversion of water, concerning the failure of all of defendants to make beneficial use of all the appropriated water could by liberal construction have been considered as a separate count, the complaint would have been subject to dismissal because it contained no statement of a claim showing plaintiffs to be entitled to relief, as relief to them under such philosophy could arise only by reason of the lack of beneficial use of the water by the individuals. Bales v. Ankney, 382 P.2d 386,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1963).

Rules of pleading. —

In action not involving an ordinary adjudication between one or more parties, on the one hand, and one or more parties, on the other, in the very nature of things, the rules of pleading to ordinary extent cannot apply. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Declaratory judgment. —

If the action of the board of control adjudicating water rights under this section and the decree of the district court affirming it was merely erroneous, no attack on the decree could be made in an action for declaratory judgment. Laramie Rivers Co. v. Levasseur, 65 Wyo. 414, 202 P.2d 680,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1949).

Enlargement of rights. —

Section

41-4-310

estops water users under decrees of state board of control, from claiming any other or greater rights than thereunder, hence in a suit to obtain enlarged rights not only the testimony offered, but that admitted, in support of the petition, was immaterial and had no tendency to establish any rights in the plaintiff. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Interpretation of adjudication. —

In absence of claims or proofs by landowners, decree adjudicating company's right to two appropriations of stated number of cubic feet of water per second from river for irrigation of specified acreage of land did not adjudicate equal proportionate shares of water to each piece of land designated. State v. Laramie Rivers Co., 59 Wyo. 9, 136 P.2d 487,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1943).

Questioning adjudication. —

In action to quiet title to water rights, claimed by prescription, in Little Laramie river, where answer sets up defense of decrees by board of control in Big Laramie river, and admission was made by plaintiffs that board of control had initiated proceeding and decreed rights in latter river and its tributaries, while denying all other allegations, decree itself only is questioned and fact that it is of a priority different in time and amount than averred is immaterial, defendant not being required to anticipate such attack at the trial. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Requirements for prescriptive title. —

Testimony and findings of the court examined failed to show prescriptive right in plaintiffs adverse to defendants, for possession to ripen into prescriptive title must be actual, hostile, exclusive, and continuous for period prescribed by statute. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

No prescriptive rights to water. —

Since 1890 when water rights were required to be initiated by permit from the state engineer, it is settled that prescriptive right to state waters cannot obtain. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

A water right by prescription being impossible up to adjudication in Little Laramie river in 1892, and it being impossible for appropriators to change their claim to priority as to time and amount in their particular tributary stream, they will not be better enabled to take a different course because their dispute is with appropriators direct from the main stream. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Relevancy. —

In action by plaintiff to quiet title, claimed by prescription, to water right in Little Laramie river watershed, and to which defendants set up decrees in that and Big Laramie rivers, adjudication in connection with Little Laramie was relevant to show plaintiff's claim unfounded, and determination in Big Laramie was relevant to show defendants' interest in the controversy. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Copy of decree admissible. —

A copy of the record of the decree of adjudication, certified by the clerk of the board of control as true and correct copy of original decree, is admissible. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Photostatic copies of pen and ink records of decrees in the board of control, showing nothing more suspicious than interlineations, interlineations will not prevent their admission as evidence, when properly certified, especially as they are what is sometimes called ancient documents. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Fact that a certified copy of a judicial proceeding omits signature of judge to the record will not render the copy inadmissible, especially if signature of judge was not necessary to validity of original record, and no statute exists requiring record of board of control to be signed by any officer. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Adjudicated water rights of long standing are not readily to be set aside

and will not be set aside unless the proof of just cause is clear, cogent and convincing. White v. Wheatland Irrigation Dist., 413 P.2d 252,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1966).

Applied

in

Cremer v. State Bd. of Control, 675 P.2d 250,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 241

(Wyo. 1984).

Quoted

in

Ward v. Yoder, 355 P.2d 371,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 1960).

Cited

in

Farm Inv. Co. v. Carpenter, 9 Wyo. 110, 61 P. 258,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 8

, 50 L.R.A. 747 (1900); Parshall v. Cowper, 22 Wyo. 385, 143 P. 302,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(1914); Garber v. Wagonhound Land & Livestock Co., 2012 WY 89, 279 P.3d 525,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(June 22, 2012); General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in the Big Horn River Sys. & All Other Sources v. State, 2015 WY 104,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Aug. 13, 2015).

Law reviews. —

For article “Rights of Wyoming Appropriators in Underground Water,” see 1 Wyo. L.J. 111.

For note, “The Right to Use Waste Water Before It Reenters the Stream,” see 12 Wyo. L.J. 47 (1957).

For note, “Forfeiture of Water Rights in Wyoming,” see 14 Wyo. L.J. 51 (1959).

For comment, “Determining Quantity in Irrigation Appropriations,” see IV Land & Water L. Rev. 501 (1969).

For article, “The Disparity Between State Water Rights Records and Actual Water Use Patterns,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 23 (1970).

For case note on Kearney Lake, Land & Reservoir Co. v. Lake DeSmet Reservoir Co., 487 P.2d 324,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 230

(Wyo. 1971), see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 599 (1972).

For case note, “Water Law — Standing Requirement Under the Wyoming Forfeiture Statute. Platte County Grazing Association v. State Board of Control, 675 P.2d 1279,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 244

(Wyo. 1984),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 485 (1984).

For comment, “Forfeiture Proceedings in Wyoming Water Law: The Legislature Revives Private Standing,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 459 (1985).

For comment, “Wyoming's New Instream Flow Act: An Administrative Quagmire,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 455 (1986).

§ 41-4-318.
Surplus water; defined.

For the purpose of this act [§§

41-4-317

through

41-4-324

], surplus water is hereby defined to be that quantity of water belonging to the state of Wyoming flowing in the natural channel of any main stream or a tributary of a main stream within the boundaries of Wyoming, at any time in excess of the total amount required to furnish to all existing appropriations from said stream system the maximum amount of water for which all said appropriations have been granted, whether by permit or by adjudicated decree as of March 1, 1945.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 153, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 71-217; W.S. 1957, § 41-182.

Plaintiff not injured by statute. —

It was impossible for plaintiff's post-March 1, 1945 water right to be injured by the Wyoming Surplus Water Law because he never obtained any right greater than the one authorized by the statute. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Thus, no standing to challenge constitutionality. —

Since plaintiff could not attack the constitutionality of the Wyoming Surplus Water Law, ch. 153, Laws 1945, on the ground of injury to rights of others, and there was no injury to plaintiff's post-March 1, 1945, rights, since only prior appropriators, not subsequent ones, could be injured by the statute, plaintiff did not have standing to challenge the constitutionality of the statute. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

The purpose and effect

of the Wyoming Surplus Water Law, ch. 153, Laws 1945, was to define, limit and clearly provide for the vesting of the right to use the excess water by the several appropriators. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Interpretation applied to Wyoming Surplus Water Law statutory provisions by state officers. —

See Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Application of definition of “surplus water.” —

The definition of the term “surplus water” in this section did not apply to water impounded by a reservoir owner over and above all that necessarily used for irrigation or other beneficial purposes in connection with his own lands under §

41-3-325

.Lake De Smet Reservoir Co. v. Kaufmann, 75 Wyo. 87, 292 P.2d 482,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1956).

Vesting of water rights. —

Water rights are real property rights which become vested as of the time the application for appropriation is filed, if the right is adjudicated. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Surplus water rights are mere entitlements to participate in the existing pool

of surplus water according to a formula which contemplates the inclusion of all appropriators' authorized irrigable acreage and which is applied to the amount of water in the stream system at any given time, and thus surplus rights do not confer authority to divert a specified amount of water. Cremer v. State Bd. of Control, 675 P.2d 250,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 241

(Wyo. 1984).

Rights subject to those of prior appropriators. —

Pursuant to art. 8, § 2, Wyo. Const., and the statutes adopted by the Wyoming legislature, water rights are perfected by the filing of an application for a water permit which then is adjudicated to the applicant by the board of control after the board has determined that the applicant does have such a right by beneficial use. The right of a citizen of Wyoming to appropriate water for purposes of irrigation is defined and limited by these statutes. Each appropriator, in turn, takes his right subject to the right of any prior appropriators from the stream. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Limited to beneficial use. —

The water right of any appropriator is limited to beneficial use, and, even though a larger amount of water has been adjudicated, the water right is subject to reduction if not applied for beneficial purposes. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Cited

in

Schulthess v. Carollo, 832 P.2d 552,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1992).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Disparity Between State Water Rights Records and Actual Water Use Patterns,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 23 (1970).

§ 41-4-319.
Surplus water; regulation and control.

It shall be the duty of the state engineer, water superintendents and water commissioners and their assistants to divide, regulate and control the diversion and taking of surplus water from any stream in a manner that all applicants will be able to obtain a proportionate share, as hereinafter defined, of the surplus water.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 153, § 5; C. S. 1945, § 71-220; W.S. 1957, § 41-183; Laws 1991, ch. 157, § 1.

Plaintiff not injured by statute. —

It was impossible for plaintiff's post-March 1, 1945 water right to be injured by the Wyoming Surplus Water Law because he never obtained any right greater than the one authorized by the statute. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

No standing to challenge constitutionality. —

Since plaintiff could not attack the constitutionality of the Wyoming Surplus Water Law, ch. 153, Laws 1945, on the ground of injury to rights of others, and there was no injury to plaintiff's post-March 1, 1945, rights, since only prior appropriators, not subsequent ones, could be injured by the statute, plaintiff did not have standing to challenge the constitutionality of the statute. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

The purpose and effect

of the Wyoming Surplus Water Law, ch. 153, Laws 1945, was to define, limit and clearly provide for the vesting of the right to use the excess water by the several appropriators. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Interpretation applied to Wyoming Surplus Water Law statutory provisions by state officers. —

See Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Vesting of water rights. —

Water rights are real property rights which become vested as of the time the application for appropriation is filed, if the right is adjudicated. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Rights subject to those of prior appropriators. —

Pursuant to art. 8, § 2, Wyo. Const., and the statutes adopted by the Wyoming legislature, water rights are perfected by the filing of an application for a water permit which then is adjudicated to the applicant by the board of control after the board has determined that the applicant does have such a right by beneficial use. The right of a citizen of Wyoming to appropriate water for purposes of irrigation is defined and limited by these statutes. Each appropriator, in turn, takes his right subject to the right of any prior appropriators from the stream. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Limited to beneficial use. —

The water right of any appropriator is limited to beneficial use, and, even though a larger amount of water has been adjudicated, the water right is subject to reduction if not applied for beneficial purposes. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

§ 41-4-320.
Surplus water; rights of use generally.

A right to the use of surplus water as herein defined in the amount of one (1) cubic foot of water per second for each seventy (70) acres of land having an adjudicated water right or a water right under permit is hereby adjudicated to attach to all original direct flow water rights, and only on lands described in adjudicated appropriations as of record in the office of the state board of control or under valid permits or filings as of record in the office of the state engineer. The rights so adjudicated shall bear date of priority as of March 1, 1945. Rights unadjudicated shall acquire the surplus right as the original is perfected.

Any permits issued or water rights granted in the state of Wyoming after March 1, 1945, shall be subject to the adjudication of surplus water as provided herein.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 153, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 71-219; W.S. 1957, § 41-184.

Plaintiff not injured by statute. —

It was impossible for plaintiff's post-March 1, 1945 water right to be injured by the Wyoming Surplus Water Law because he never obtained any right greater than the one authorized by the statute. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

No standing to challenged constitutionality. —

Since plaintiff could not attack the constitutionality of the Wyoming Surplus Water Law, ch. 153, Laws 1945, on the ground of injury to rights of others, and there was no injury to plaintiff's post-March 1, 1945, rights, since only prior appropriators, not subsequent ones, could be injured by the statute, plaintiff did not have standing to challenge the constitutionality of the statute. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

The purpose and effect

of the Wyoming Surplus Water Law, ch. 153, Laws 1945, was to define, limit and clearly provide for the vesting of the right to use the excess water by the several appropriators. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Interpretation applied to Wyoming Surplus Water Law statutory provisions by state officers. —

See Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Statutory measure of water not per se standard for waste. —

While it must be accepted that the statutory duty of water of one c.f.s. per 70 acres is controlling in those instances in which it applies, it is appropriate to perceive that statutory measure as primarily controlling the allocation of a scarce resource rather than a per se standard for waste. State ex rel. Squaw Mountain Cattle Co. v. Wheatland Irrigation Dist., 728 P.2d 172,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 639

(Wyo. 1986).

Vesting of water rights. —

Water rights are real property rights which become vested as of the time the application for appropriation is filed, if the right is adjudicated. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Surplus water rights are mere entitlements to participate in the existing pool

of surplus water according to a formula which contemplates the inclusion of all appropriators' authorized irrigable acreage and which is applied to the amount of water in the stream system at any given time, and thus surplus rights do not confer authority to divert a specified amount of water. Cremer v. State Bd. of Control, 675 P.2d 250,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 241

(Wyo. 1984).

Rights subject to those of prior appropriators. —

Pursuant to art. 8, § 2, Wyo. Const., and the statutes adopted by the Wyoming legislature, water rights are perfected by the filing of an application for a water permit which then is adjudicated to the applicant by the board of control after the board has determined that the applicant does have such a right by beneficial use. The right of a citizen of Wyoming to appropriate water for purposes of irrigation is defined and limited by these statutes. Each appropriator, in turn, takes his right subject to the right of any prior appropriators from the stream. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Limited to beneficial use. —

The water right of any appropriator is limited to beneficial use, and, even though a larger amount of water has been adjudicated, the water right is subject to reduction if not applied for beneficial purposes. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

§ 41-4-321.
Surplus water; who may divert.

Surplus water, as herein defined, may be diverted by anyone having either an adjudicated appropriation or a permit granting a right to divert and take from said stream and/or its tributaries a quantity of water for beneficial use.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 153, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 71-218; W.S. 1957, § 41-185.

Plaintiff not injured by statute. —

It was impossible for plaintiff's post-March 1, 1945 water right to be injured by the Wyoming Surplus Water Law because he never obtained any right greater than the one authorized by the statute. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Thus, no standing to challenge constitutionality. —

Since plaintiff could not attack the constitutionality of the Wyoming Surplus Water Law, ch. 153, Laws 1945, on the ground of injury to rights of others, and there was no injury to plaintiff's post-March 1, 1945, rights, since only prior appropriators, not subsequent ones, could be injured by the statute, plaintiff did not have standing to challenge the constitutionality of the statute. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

The purpose and effect

of the Wyoming Surplus Water Law, ch. 153, Laws 1945, was to define, limit and clearly provide for the vesting of the right to use the excess water by the several appropriators. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Interpretation applied to Wyoming Surplus Water Law statutory provisions by state officers. —

See Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Vesting of water rights. —

Water rights are real property rights which become vested as of the time the application for appropriation is filed, if the right is adjudicated. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Rights subject to those of prior appropriators. —

Pursuant to art. 8, § 2, Wyo. Const., and the statutes adopted by the Wyoming legislature, water rights are perfected by the filing of an application for a water permit which then is adjudicated to the applicant by the board of control after the board has determined that the applicant does have such a right by beneficial use. The right of a citizen of Wyoming to appropriate water for purposes of irrigation is defined and limited by these statutes. Each appropriator, in turn, takes his right subject to the right of any prior appropriators from the stream. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

And limited to beneficial use. —

The water right of any appropriator is limited to beneficial use, and, even though a larger amount of water has been adjudicated, the water right is subject to reduction if not applied for beneficial purposes. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).